Louisiana, session 2026, HB1023.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1226(B)(3)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1226. Rehabilitation of injured employees
* * *
B.
* * *
(3)(a) The employer shall be responsible for the selection of a licensed
professional vocational rehabilitation counselor to evaluate and assist the employee
in his job placement or vocational training. The employer or employee may request
vocational services from the office of workers' compensation administration through
a process determined by the assistant secretary. Upon request, the assistant secretary
shall appoint a vocational rehabilitation counselor from a list of counselors compiled
by the assistant secretary. Should the employer refuse to provide these services, or
If a dispute arises concerning regarding the work of the vocational rehabilitation
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2586 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1023
counselor, the employee or employer may file a claim with the office to review the
need for such the vocational services or the quality of the services being provided.
The employee shall have a right to an expedited summary proceeding pursuant to
R.S. 23:1201.1(K)(8). The workers' compensation judge shall set a hearing date
within three days of receiving the motion. The hearing shall be held not less than
ten, nor more than thirty, days, after the employer or payor receives notice, delivered
by certified or registered mail, of the employee's motion. The workers'
compensation judge shall provide notice of the hearing date to the employer and
payor at the same time and in the same manner that notice of the hearing date is
provided to the employee or his attorney. For the purposes of this Section, an
employee shall not be required to submit the dispute on the issue of vocational
services to mediation or go through a pretrial conference before obtaining a hearing.
The hearing shall be conducted as a rule to show cause.
* * *